Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.893] PROHIBITION ON EMPLOYMENT AND LICENSURE; FORMER ICE AND BORDER PATROL AGENTS. new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency must not employ and the Peace Officer Standards and Training Board must not issue a license to a person who was hired as a sworn officer of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or the United States Border Patrol on or after January 20, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to persons seeking employment or initial licensure as a peace officer on or after that date. new text end